Utah statutes.
31A-22-1412.   Nonforfeiture benefits.
(1) (a)  A long-term care insurance policy or certificate may not be delivered
or issued for delivery in this state unless the policyholder or certificate
holder has been offered the option of purchasing a policy or certificate
including a nonforfeiture benefit.
(b)  The offer of a nonforfeiture benefit under Subsection (1)(a) may be in
the form of a rider that is attached to the policy.
(c)  If the policyholder or certificate holder declines the nonforfeiture
benefit offered under this Subsection (1), the insurer shall provide a
contingent benefit upon lapse of the policy or certificate that is available
for a specified period of time following a substantial increase in premium
rates.
(d) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(d)(ii), if a group long-term
care insurance policy is issued, the offer required in this Subsection (1)
shall be made to the group policyholder.
(ii)  If the policy is issued to a group authorized under Section 31A-22-509,
the offer required under this Subsection (1) shall be made to each proposed
certificate holder.
(2)  The commissioner shall make rules:
(a)  specifying the types of nonforfeiture benefits to be offered as part of a
long-term care insurance policy or certificate;
(b)  specifying the standards for nonforfeiture benefits; and
(c)  regarding contingent benefits upon lapse, including a determination of:
(i)  the specified period of time during which a contingent benefit upon lapse
will be available as provided in Subsection (1); and
(ii)  the substantial premium rate increase that triggers a contingent benefit
upon lapse as provided in Subsection (1).
